Washington statutes.
RCW 14.08.116

Port district revenue bond financing powers not repealed or superseded.

Nothing in RCW 14.08.112 and 14.08.114 shall repeal or supersede revenue bond financing powers otherwise granted to port districts under the provisions of chapter 53.40 RCW.

[ 1957 c 53 s 3.]